District of Columbia statutes.
1-525.01

Modifications of Board of Education Reduction-in-Force procedures.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, or regulation, an employee of the District of Columbia Public Schools shall be:

(1)

Classified as an Educational Service employee;

(2)

Placed under the personnel authority of the Board of Education; and

(3)

Subject to all Board of Education rules.

(b)

School-based personnel shall constitute a separate competitive area from nonschool-based personnel who shall not compete with school-based personnel for retention purposes.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 215, Pub. L. 104-134, § 146
Sept. 9, 1996, 110 Stat. 2372, Pub. L. 104-194, § 139

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-609.2.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter IX-A (Reserved), see § 2(j) of the Legal Service Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-620, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1343).